Florida, session 2026, SB646.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.â(1)âThe Legislature finds and declares that 11 this state continues to experience unprecedented deaths caused 12 by synthetic opioids, stimulants, and other adulterated or 13 misrepresented substances in the illicit drug supply. 14 (2)âIn the 2024 Annual Report of the Florida Medical 15 Examiners, Florida Department of Law Enforcement, the most 16 frequently occurring drugs found in decedents were fentanyl and 17 fentanyl analogs, benzodiazepines, cannabinoids, morphine, 18 xylazine, cocaine, methamphetamine, amphetamine, gabapentin, 19 cathinones, and oxycodone. 20 (3)âThe Legislature recognizes that drug-testing products, 21 including test strips, reagent kits, and related products, are 22 evidence-based harm reduction strategies that do not encourage 23 drug use, but, instead, prevent overdose and death by allowing 24 individuals and communities to identify the presence of 25 dangerous controlled substances and adulterants. 26 (4)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to decriminalize 27 the possession, distribution, and use of drug-testing products 28 so that residents of this state can access life-saving 29 information about controlled substances and adulterants before 30 tragedy occurs. 31 Section 2.âSection 893.145, Florida Statutes, is amended to 32 read: 33 893.145ââDrug paraphernaliaâ defined.âThe term âdrug 34 paraphernaliaâ means all equipment, products, and materials of 35 any kind which are used, intended for use, or designed for use 36 in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, 37 manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, 38 preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, 39 containing, concealing, transporting, injecting, ingesting, 40 inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a 41 controlled substance in violation of this chapter or s. 877.111. 42 Drug paraphernalia is deemed to be contraband which shall be 43 subject to civil forfeiture. The term includes, but is not 44 limited to: 45 (1)âKits used, intended for use, or designed for use in the 46 planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of 47 any species of plant which is a controlled substance or from 48 which a controlled substance can be derived. 49 (2)âKits used, intended for use, or designed for use in 50 manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, 51 or preparing controlled substances. 52 (3)âIsomerization devices used, intended for use, or 53 designed for use in increasing the potency of any species of 54 plant which is a controlled substance. 55 (4)âTesting equipment used, intended for use, or designed 56 for use in identifying, or in analyzing the strength, 57 effectiveness, or purity of, controlled substances. The term 58 does not include test strips, reagent kits, or any other, 59 excluding narcotic-drug-testing products that are used solely to 60 determine whether a controlled substance contains fentanyl as 61 described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9. or dangerous fentanyl or fentanyl 62 analogues as any other controlled substance specified in s. 63 893.135(1)(c)4.a., xylazine, cocaine, amphetamines, cathinones, 64 or any other controlled substance or adulterant. This exclusion 65 does not apply to a narcotic-drug-testing product that can 66 measure or determine the quantity, weight, or potency of a 67 controlled substance. 68 (5)âScales and balances used, intended for use, or designed 69 for use in weighing or measuring controlled substances. 70 (6)âDiluents and adulterants, such as quinine 71 hydrochloride, caffeine, dimethyl sulfone, mannitol, mannite, 72 dextrose, and lactose, used, intended for use, or designed for 73 use in diluting controlled substances; or substances such as 74 damiana leaf, marshmallow leaf, and mullein leaf, used, intended 75 for use, or designed for use as carrier mediums of controlled 76 substances. 77 (7)âSeparation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or 78 designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in 79 otherwise cleaning or refining, cannabis. 80 (8)âBlenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing devices 81 used, intended for use, or designed for use in compounding 82 controlled substances. 83 (9)âCapsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers 84 used, intended for use, or designed for use in packaging small 85 quantities of controlled substances. 86 (10)âContainers and other objects used, intended for use, 87 or designed for use in storing, concealing, or transporting 88 controlled substances. 89 (11)âHypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, 90 intended for use, or designed for use in parenterally injecting 91 controlled substances into the human body. 92 (12)âObjects used, intended for use, or designed for use in 93 ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing controlled 94 substances, as described in s. 893.03, or substances described 95 in s. 877.111(1) into the human body, such as: 96 (a)âMetal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or 97 ceramic pipes, with or without screens, permanent screens, 98 hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls. 99 (b)âWater pipes. 100 (c)âCarburetion tubes and devices. 101 (d)âSmoking and carburetion masks. 102 (e)âRoach clips: meaning objects used to hold burning 103 material, such as a cannabis cigarette, that has become too 104 small or too short to be held in the hand. 105 (f)âMiniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials. 106 (g)âChamber pipes. 107 (h)âCarburetor pipes. 108 (i)âElectric pipes. 109 (j)âAir-driven pipes. 110 (k)âChillums. 111 (l)âBongs. 112 (m)âIce pipes or chillers. 113 (n)âA cartridge or canister, which means a small metal 114 device used to contain nitrous oxide. 115 (o)âA charger, sometimes referred to as a âcracker,â which 116 means a small metal or plastic device that contains an interior 117 pin that may be used to expel nitrous oxide from a cartridge or 118 container. 119 (p)âA charging bottle, which means a device that may be 120 used to expel nitrous oxide from a cartridge or canister. 121 (q)âA whip-it, which means a device that may be used to 122 expel nitrous oxide. 123 (r)âA tank. 124 (s)âA balloon. 125 (t)âA hose or tube. 126 (u)âA 2-liter-type soda bottle. 127 (v)âDuct tape. 128 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.